Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-110
Precincts; numbering; division.

Precinct lines within the corporate limits of a city of the primary class shall correspond in number with the ward and be coextensive with such limits, except that when a ward is divided into election districts, the precinct corresponding with such ward shall be divided to correspond with the election district.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 11, p. 74;

R.S.1913, § 4413;

C.S.1922, § 3789;

C.S.1929, § 15-110;

R.S.1943, § 15-110;

Laws 1961, c. 35, § 1, p. 157;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 13.